Utah statutes.
47-3-201.   Assumption of risk.

A person who participates in shooting at a shooting range or a public shooting range accepts the associated risks to the extent the risks are obvious and inherent.  Those risks include injuries that may result from noise, discharge of projectile or shot, malfunction of shooting equipment not owned by the shooting range or public shooting range, natural variations in terrain, surface or subsurface snow or ice conditions, bare spots, rocks, trees, and other forms of natural growth or debris.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

